Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-204.02
Bingo chairperson, defined.

Bingo chairperson shall mean one individual member of a licensed organization who is designated as responsible for overseeing the organization's bingo activities.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 8.